California statutes. Public Resources Code
The conservancy may manage, operate, administer, and maintain the lands and facilities it acquires, in accordance with the purposes set forth in Section 32602. The conservancy may adopt regulations governing the use by the public of conservancy lands and facilities and may provide for the enforcement of those regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 789, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

32612.

(a) The conservancy may acquire real property or any interest in real property pursuant to the Property Acquisition Law (Part 11 (commencing with Section 15850) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) within the conservancy’s territory from willing sellers and at fair market value, upon a finding that the acquisition is consistent with the purposes of the conservancy, as set forth in Section 32602. The conservancy may acquire the property itself or may coordinate the acquisition through other public agencies that have the authority to
 acquire property and that have available funding or land to exchange. The conservancy may hold a remainder interest in property in those instances in which an owner desires to sell the property and retain a life estate, and may create and administer a mitigation land bank and arrange land exchanges, consistent with the purposes set forth in Section 32602. The overall objective of the land acquisition program shall be to assist in accomplishing land transactions that are mutually beneficial to the landowner and the conservancy, and that meet the conservancy’s purposes. Neither the conservancy nor the State Public Works Board shall exercise the power of eminent domain pursuant to this division.

(b) To the extent not in conflict with any other law, the conservancy may exercise the right of first refusal for surplus public agency property located within its territory for the purposes of the conservancy set forth in Section 32602 subject to the
 conditions and provisions of the adopted San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Parkway and Open Space Plan, and shall conform to all relevant general and specific plans and zoning regulations of local agencies within the territory of the conservancy.

(c) Prior to entering into an agreement to acquire any interest in real property within the territory of the conservancy for open space or conservation purposes, the conservancy shall provide 30 days written notice to the legislative body of the affected local agency, if such a project was not included in the San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Parkway and Open Space Plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 789, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

32613.

(a) The conservancy shall have, and may exercise, all rights and powers, expressed or implied, necessary to carry out the purposes of this division, except as otherwise provided.

(b) The conservancy may not levy a tax, exercise the power of eminent domain, or regulate land use except on lands it owns, manages or controls. The conservancy shall be subject to all laws, regulations, and general and specific plans of the legislative body of any city in which the conservancy proposes
 to take action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 789, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

32614.

The conservancy may do all of the following:

(a) Sue and be sued.

(b) Enter into contracts with any public agency, private entity, or person necessary for the proper discharge of the conservancy’s duties, and enter into a joint powers agreement with a public agency, in furtherance of the purposes set forth in Section 32602.

(c) Lease, rent, sell, exchange, or otherwise
 transfer any real property or interest therein or any option acquired under this division to a local public agency, state agency, federal agency, nonprofit organization, individual, or other entity pursuant to terms and conditions approved by the conservancy pursuant to terms and conditions approved by the conservancy for management purposes, in accordance with the purposes set forth in Section 32602. Prior to entering into an agreement to lease, rent, sell, exchange, or otherwise transfer any real property or interest therein or any option acquired under this division within the territory of the conservancy, the conservancy shall provide 30 days written notice to the legislative body of the affected local agency, if the project was not included in the San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Parkway and Open Space Plan.

(d) Initiate, negotiate, and participate in an agreement for the management of land under its ownership or control by a local public
 agency, state agency, federal agency, nonprofit organization, individual, or other entity, and initiate, negotiate, and participate in an agreement for the management of land under the ownership or control of any of those entities by the conservancy, in accordance with the purposes set forth in Section 32602.

(e) Enter into any other agreement with any public agency, private entity, or person necessary for the proper discharge of the conservancy’s duties for the purposes set forth in Section 32602.

(f) Recruit and coordinate volunteers and experts to conduct interpretive and recreational programs and assist with construction projects and the maintenance of parkway facilities.

(g) Undertake, within the territory, site improvement projects, regulate public access, and revegetate and otherwise rehabilitate degraded
 areas, in consultation with any other public agency with appropriate jurisdiction and expertise, in accordance with the purposes set forth in Section 32602. The conservancy may also, within the territory, upgrade deteriorating facilities and construct new facilities as needed for outdoor recreation, nature appreciation and interpretation, and natural resources projection. The conservancy may undertake those projects by itself or in conjunction with another local agency; however, the conservancy shall provide overall coordination of those projects by setting priorities for the projects and by ensuring a uniform approach to projects. The conservancy may undertake those projects with prior notification to the legislative body of the local agency that has jurisdiction in the area in which the conservancy proposes to undertake that activity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 789, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

32614.5.

(a) The conservancy may award grants to local public agencies, state agencies, federal agencies, and nonprofit organizations for the purposes of this division.

(b) Grants to nonprofit organizations for the acquisition of real property or interests in real property shall be subject to all of the following conditions:

(1) The purchase price of any interest in land acquired by the nonprofit organization may not
 exceed fair market value as established by an appraisal approved by the conservancy.

(2) The conservancy approves the terms under which the interest in land is acquired.

(3) The interest in land acquired pursuant to a grant from the conservancy may not be used as security for any debt incurred by the nonprofit organization unless the conservancy approves the transaction.

(4) The transfer of land acquired pursuant to a grant shall be subject to the approval of the conservancy and the execution of an agreement between the conservancy and the transferee sufficient to protect the interests of the state.

(5) The state shall have a right of entry and power of termination in and over all interests in real property acquired with state funds, which may be
 exercised if any essential term or condition of the grant is violated.

(6) If the existence of the nonprofit organization is terminated for any reason, title to all interest in real property acquired with state funds shall immediately vest in the state, except that, prior to that termination, another public agency or nonprofit organization may receive title to all or a portion of that interest in real property, by recording its acceptance of title, together with the conservancy’s approval, in writing.

(c) Any deed or other instrument of conveyance whereby real property is acquired by a nonprofit organization pursuant to this section shall be recorded and shall set forth the executory interest or right of entry on the part of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 789, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

32615.

The conservancy shall administer any funds appropriated to it, and may expend those funds for capital improvements, land acquisition, or support of the conservancy’s operations, in accordance with the purposes set forth in Section 32602. The conservancy may also accept any revenue, money, grants, goods, or services contributed to it by any public agency, private entity, or person and, upon receipt, may use the revenue, money, grants, goods, or services for capital improvements, land acquisitions, or support of the conservancy’s operations, in accordance with the
 purposes set forth in Section 32602.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 789, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

32616.

(a) The conservancy may fix and collect fees for the use of any land owned or controlled, or for any service provided, by the conservancy. No fee shall exceed the cost of maintaining and operating the land or of providing the service for which the fee is charged.

(b) The fee revenue and all other revenue received pursuant to this division shall be deposited in the San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy Fund, which is hereby created in the State
 Treasury. The money in the fund shall be expended by the conservancy, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purposes of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 789, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Limitations [32620. - 32621.]

32620.

Nothing in this division shall be interpreted to grant the board any regulatory or governing authority over any ordinance or regulatory measure adopted by a city, county, or special district that pertains to land use, water rights, or environmental quality.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 788, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

32621.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, the conservancy shall not take any action that does any of the following:

(1) Interferes or conflicts with the exercise of the powers or duties of any watermaster, public agency, or other body or entity responsible for groundwater or surface water management or groundwater replenishment as designated or established pursuant to any adjudication or statute.

(2) Interferes or conflicts with any provision of any judgment or court order issued, or rule or regulation adopted, pursuant to any adjudication affecting water or water management in the San Gabriel River watershed and basin.

(3) Impedes or adversely impacts any previously adopted Los Angeles County Drainage Area project, as described in the report of the Chief of Engineers dated June 30, 1992, including any supplement or addendum to that report as of September 1, 1999, or any maintenance agreement to operate the project.

(4) Results in the degradation of water quality, or interferes or conflicts with any action by a watermaster or public agency that is authorized pursuant to statute, any water right or adjudication including, but not limited to, any action relating to water conservation, groundwater recharge, conservation or storage of water, or both, the pumping
 of groundwater, water treatment, the regulation of spreading, injection, pumping, storage, or the use of water from local sources, stormwater flows and runoff, or from imported or reclaimed water that is undertaken in connection with the management of the San Gabriel River or any branch, stream, fork, or tributary thereof, a groundwater basin, or groundwater resource.

(5) Interferes with, obstructs, hinders, or delays the exercise of, any water right by the owner of a public water system, including, but not limited to, the construction, operation, maintenance, replacement, repair, location, or relocation of any well or water pumping, treatment, or storage facility, pipeline, or other facility or property necessary or useful to the operation of the public water system.

(b) The conservancy shall provide written notice to every water association in the jurisdiction of the conservancy
 of any proposed action, policy, or project that may affect any water right or water delivery system at least 45 calendar days prior to the date set for approval of any of those matters by the conservancy.

(c) As used in this section, “adjudication” means any final judgment or order entered in any judicial proceeding adjudicating or affecting water rights, surface water management, or groundwater management.

(d) The conservancy shall consult with other conservancies within the Resources Agency prior to implementing any project pursuant to this division in which there may be a jurisdictional overlap between those conservancies. Each of those conservancies shall make its best effort to resolve any issues regarding any project development that is carried out pursuant to this division in a mutually advantageous and environmentally beneficial manner. Any dispute between the
 conservancies shall be referred to the Resources Agency for resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 788, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Lower Los Angeles River Working Group [32622. - 32622.]

32622.

(a) The Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency shall appoint, in consultation with the Los Angeles County Board of Supervisors to the extent that the board wishes to consult, a local working group to develop a revitalization plan for the Lower Los Angeles
 River watershed, called the Lower Los Angeles River Working Group.
 The secretary shall consider requests from local agency representatives to participate in the working group. The working group
 may include, but need not be limited to, representatives from the conservancy, the County of Los Angeles, the Gateway Cities Council of Governments, the Los Angeles Gateway Region Integrated Regional Water Management Joint Powers Authority, elected officials of the cities riparian to the Los Angeles River, and nonprofit organizations serving the Los Angeles River region.

(b) On or before March 1, 2017, the working group shall develop, through watershed-based planning methods, a revitalization plan that addresses the unique and diverse needs of the Lower Los Angeles River and the communities through which it
 passes. The plan shall be consistent with and enhance, and may be incorporated into, the County of Los Angeles’s Master Plan for the entire Los Angeles River. The plan shall include watershed education programs that help the Los Angeles River communities recognize the value of the river and the importance of protecting the river’s watershed resources and its vitality to their communities.

(c) The conservancy shall provide any necessary staffing to the working group to assist in the development of the plan.

(d) The
 development and implementation of the revitalization plan may be eligible for funding from any public or private source, including, but not limited to, funding pursuant to Section 79735 of the Water Code. Entities that are eligible to implement the revitalization plan include, but are not limited to, state agencies, local agencies, and nonprofit organizations, and may be eligible for state funding.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 684, Sec. 2.   (AB 530)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 22.9. SAN DIEGO RIVER CONSERVANCY [32630. - 32659.9.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [32630. - 32632.]

32630.

This division shall be known, and may be cited, as the San Diego River Conservancy Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 574, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

32631.

(a) The San Diego River is a natural, historic, and recreational resource in the heart of San Diego. From its headwaters near the town of Julian in east San Diego County, it runs 52 miles through Mission Valley and the first settlement in California at Old Town San Diego before it empties into the Pacific Ocean at Ocean Beach. The river has been subjected to intense development in some parts; it runs through one of San Diego’s most populated neighborhoods and is in need of restoration, conservation, and enhancement all along its length. The area presents excellent opportunities for recreation, scientific research, historic preservation of the first aqueduct in the United States, and educational and cultural activities, of value to California and the nation. Reestablishing the cultural and historic connections between the San Diego River, Old Town San Diego State Historic Park, the Military Presidio, and the Kumeyaay Nation will provide the public with the opportunity to appreciate the state’s historic beginnings.

(b) Given the opportunities available, the state recognizes the importance of holding this land in trust to be preserved and enhanced for the enjoyment of present and future generations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 406, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

32632.

For the purposes of this division, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Conservancy” means the San Diego River Conservancy established by this division.

(b) “Fund” means the San Diego River Conservancy Fund established pursuant to Section 32657.

(c) “Governing board” means the governing board of the conservancy.

(d) “Historic flumes” means both of the following:

(1) The Padre Dam flume built by Native Americans along the San Diego River to convey
 water from the Mission Dam to the Mission San Diego de Alcala in the early 1800s.

(2) The flume built by the San Diego Flume Company in the late 1880s to convey water from a diverting dam on the upper San Diego River to the eastern edge of the City of San Diego.

(e) “Local public agency” means a city, county, district, or joint powers agency.

(f) “Nonprofit organization” means a private, nonprofit organization that qualifies for exempt status under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended, and that has among its principal charitable purposes the preservation of land for scientific, historic, educational, recreational, scenic, or open-space opportunities, the protection of the natural environment, or
 preservation or enhancement of wildlife.

(g) “San Diego River area” or “area” means those lands located within the watershed of the San Diego River, from its headwaters near Julian to the Pacific Ocean at Dog Beach in San Diego.

(h) “Tribal nation” means a Kumeyaay Band that is a federally recognized tribe or a nonfederally recognized California Native American tribe that is on the contact list maintained by the Native American Heritage Commission. The Kumeyaay Band must be located within traditionally and culturally affiliated ancestral
 Kumeyaay territory within the County of San Diego.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 448, Sec. 1.   (SB 1027)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. The San Diego River Conservancy [32633. - 32638.]

32633.

There is in the Natural Resources Agency, the San Diego River Conservancy, which is created for the following purposes:

(a) To acquire and manage public lands within the San Diego River area, and to provide recreational opportunities, open space, wildlife habitat and species restoration and protection, wetland protection and restoration, protection of historical and cultural resources, and protection, maintenance, and improvements of the quality of the waters in the San Diego River and its watershed, its tributaries, and historic flumes emanating from the river for all beneficial uses, lands for educational uses within the area, and natural floodwater
 conveyance.

(b) To provide for the public’s enjoyment, and to enhance the recreational and educational experience and cultural and historic interpretation on public lands in the territory in a manner consistent with the protection of land and natural resources, as well as economic resources, in the area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 306, Sec. 2.   (SB 214)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

32634.

(a) The governing board of the conservancy shall consist of 16 voting members and two nonvoting members.

(b) The voting members of the board shall consist of the following:

(1) The Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, or their designee.

(2) The Director of Finance, or their designee.

(3) The Director of Parks and Recreation,
 or their designee.

(4) The Director of Fish and Wildlife, or their designee.

(5) A representative of the Colorado Desert District of the Department of Parks and Recreation, or their designee.

(6) Five members of the public at large, three of whom shall be appointed by the Governor, one of whom shall be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, and one of whom shall be appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.

(7) The Mayor of San Diego, or their designee.

(8) One member of the City Council of El Cajon, elected by a majority of the membership of the council.

(9) One member of the City Council of San Diego, elected by a majority of the membership of the council.

(10) One member of the Board of Supervisors of the County of San Diego, whose district includes the preponderance of the San Diego River watershed.

(11) One member of the Kumeyaay Diegueño Land Conservancy board of directors, elected by a majority of the membership of that board, or their designee.

(12) One member of the City Council of Santee, elected by a majority of the membership of the council.

(c) The two nonvoting members shall consist of the following:

(1) The Executive Director of the Wildlife Conservation Board, or their designee.

(2) A representative selected by the San Diego Regional Water Quality Control Board.

(d) Two of the three initial appointments by the Governor pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) shall be for three-year terms and the third appointment shall be for a two-year term. All subsequent appointments shall be for four-year terms.

(e) A person shall
 not continue as a member of the governing board if that person ceases to hold the office that qualifies that person for membership. Upon the occurrence of those events, the person’s membership on the governing board shall automatically terminate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 448, Sec. 2.   (SB 1027)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

32635.

The members of the conservancy that are not full-time public employees may be compensated for attendance at regular meetings of the conservancy at the rate of one hundred dollars ($100) per regular meeting, not to exceed 12 regular meetings a year. All members of the conservancy may be reimbursed the actual amount of the reasonable and necessary expenditures incurred in attending meetings of the conservancy and carrying out the duties of their office.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 574, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

32636.

The governing board shall elect from its own members a chairperson and vice chairperson, whose terms of office shall be two years, and who may serve more than one term. In the event of a vacancy, a new chairperson or vice chairperson may be elected by the governing body before the expiration of the two-year term to fill out the remainder of that two-year term.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 574, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

32637.

(a) A majority of the total voting membership of the governing body shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of the business of the conservancy. If a quorum is present, a majority vote of the members present is sufficient to transact the business of the governing board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 574, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

32638.

The governing board shall adopt its own rules and procedures necessary to conduct its business.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 574, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Powers and Duties [32639. - 32656.1.]

32639.

The conservancy shall establish an office within the San Diego River watershed. The conservancy may rent or own real and personal property and equipment pursuant to applicable statutes and regulations. The conservancy shall not levy a tax or regulate land use.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 306, Sec. 4.   (SB 214)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

32640.

All meetings of the governing board are subject to the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 574, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

32641.

The governing body shall determine the qualification of, and shall appoint, the executive officer of the conservancy and shall employ other necessary staff persons to execute the powers and duties of the conservancy in accordance with the State Civil Service Act (Part 2 (commencing with Section 18500) of Division 5 of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 574, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

32642.

The conservancy may do any of the following to assist in the decisionmaking process for the purposes of this division:

(a) Establish advisory boards, panels, or committees.

(b) Engage in public outreach.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 738, Sec. 1.   (SB 1367)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

32643.

The conservancy may do any of the following to provide necessary services:

(a) Select and hire private consultants or contractors.

(b) Enter into memorandums of understanding with state and local public agencies, and other entities and organizations.

(c) Enter into a joint powers agreement pursuant to the Joint Exercise of Powers Act, as described in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 738, Sec. 2.   (SB 1367)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

32644.

The jurisdiction of the conservancy is limited to the watershed of the San Diego River.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 448, Sec. 3.   (SB 1027)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

32645.

The conservancy may take any of the following actions for the purposes of this division:

(a) Select and acquire real property or interests in real property in the name of the state pursuant to the Property Acquisition Law (Part 11 (commencing with Section 15850) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The conservancy may coordinate the acquisition with public agencies or partner
 organizations if the site is under immediate development pressure.

(b) Acquire interests in land by various means, including, but not limited to, land exchanges, easements, development rights, life estates, leases, and leaseback agreements.

(c) Accept and hold real property or an interest in real property that is acquired through acquisition, gift, exchange, donation, or dedication.

(d) Local public agencies shall retain exclusive authority over all zoning or land use regulations within their jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 306, Sec. 6.   (SB 214)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

32646.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the conservancy has the first right of refusal to acquire any public lands that are suitable for park and open space within the conservancy’s jurisdiction when those lands become available. The conservancy may not exercise the power of eminent domain.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 646, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

32647.

The conservancy may designate or enter into an agreement with any public agency to provide real estate services, and may assign authority to execute agreements for the acquisition or disposal of real property or interests in real property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 574, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

32648.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the conservancy may not enter into an option to purchase land in fee simple or a lesser interest for an amount in excess of three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 574, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

32649.

(a) The conservancy may award grants to any local public agency, state agency, joint powers agency, special district, tribal nation, and nonprofit organization consistent with the purposes of this division.

(b) A grant from the conservancy to an entity described in subdivision (a) for the acquisition of real property or an interest in real property is subject to all of the following conditions:

(1) The purchase price of any interest in land acquired may not exceed fair market value, as established by an
 appraisal that is approved by the conservancy.

(2) The conservancy shall approve the terms under which the interest in land is acquired.

(3) An interest in land acquired through the use of a grant may not be used as security for any debt to be incurred by the entity.

(4) A transfer of land acquired through the use of a grant is subject to the approval of the conservancy and the execution of an agreement between the conservancy and the transferee sufficient to protect the interest of the people of the state.

(5) The state shall have the right of entry and power of termination over any interest in real property acquired with state funds, and may exercise those
 rights if any material term or condition of the grant is violated.

(6) If the entity receiving the grant ceases to exist for any reason, the title to all interests in real property acquired with state funds shall immediately vest in the state, except that, prior to that termination, any other public agency or nonprofit organization may receive, upon approval by the conservancy, title to all or a portion of that interest, by recording a written acceptance of title and the conservancy’s written approval with the county recorder’s office of the county with jurisdiction over the property.

(7) If the terms and conditions of the grant are not met, the conservancy may seek repayment of moneys granted pursuant to that grant.

(c) Any deed or other instrument of conveyance evidencing the final acquisition of real property by an entity pursuant to this section shall be recorded with the county recorder’s office in the county with jurisdiction over the property, and shall detail the state’s right of entry and power of termination of any interest in the property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 306, Sec. 7.   (SB 214)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

32650.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the conservancy may lease, rent, sell, exchange, or otherwise transfer any real property or interest in real property that is acquired under this division to a local public agency, state agency, federal agency, nonprofit organization, individual, corporate entity, or partnership for management purposes pursuant to terms and conditions approved by the conservancy. The conservancy may request the Director of General Services to undertake these actions on its behalf.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 574, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

32651.

The conservancy may take any of the following actions for the purposes of this division:

(a) Initiate, negotiate, and participate in agreements for the management of land under its ownership or control with a local public agency, state agency, federal agency, nonprofit organization, tribal nation, individual, corporate entity, and partnership, and enter into any other agreement authorized by state or federal law.

(b) Improve, develop, and preserve lands for the purpose of protecting the natural, cultural, and
 historical resources, or otherwise meeting the purposes of this division. Those purposes include protecting environmental resources by preserving and enhancing the state’s most valuable natural resources in the San Diego River area, including natural lands such as wetlands, watersheds, wildlife habitat, and other wildlands, recreation lands such as parks, trails, greenbelts, and other open-space lands, and landscapes with locally unique features and areas identified by the state as deserving special protection.

(c) Merge or split parcels, adjust boundary lines, or take similar actions as part of the acquisition of land, or as needed in order to facilitate the management of land under its ownership or control.

(d) Fix and collect fees for any service rendered by the conservancy.
 The amount of the fee may not exceed the reasonable cost of providing the service rendered by the conservancy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 306, Sec. 8.   (SB 214)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

32652.

The conservancy may receive any gift, donation, subvention, grant, rent, royalty, and other financial aid and funds from any private or public source, or both.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 574, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

32653.

(a) The conservancy may develop and coordinate an integrated program of resource stewardship to manage the entire San Diego River Area in a manner that balances the recreational needs of the surrounding communities with strong protection of the area’s natural resources.

(b) The conservancy shall establish policies and priorities within the San Diego River Area, and conduct any necessary planning activities in accordance with the purposes of this division.

(c) The conservancy shall establish priorities to be given to projects that create or enhance opportunities that provide recreation, aesthetic improvement, wildlife habitat, wetlands protection, water quality, and natural flood control in the San Diego River Area.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 574, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

32654.

(a) The conservancy, in consultation with other public agencies with appropriate jurisdiction and expertise, may do all of the following for any degraded area:

(1) Undertake site improvement projects.

(2) Regulate public access.

(3) Provide for restoration and rehabilitation.

(b) The conservancy may upgrade deteriorating facilities, and construct new facilities as needed for outdoor recreation, nature appreciation and interpretation, and natural resource protection.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 574, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

32655.

The conservancy has, and may exercise, all rights and powers, expressed or implied, necessary to carry out the purposes of this division, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 574, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

32656.

The conservancy may sue and be sued.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 574, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

32656.1.

(a) On or before January 1, 2017, and on or before January 1 of every odd-numbered year thereafter, the conservancy shall prepare and submit to the Governor and the Legislature a report that includes all of the following:

(1) A description of, and the amount of money expended for, every project funded or undertaken by the conservancy, directly or by an entity under the direction of the conservancy, during the two years prior to the date of the report.

(2) A description of the progress made in accomplishing the purposes of this division during the two years prior to the date of the report.

(3) Recommendations regarding legislative action
 that may be necessary to provide funding or other resources to enable the conservancy to more effectively and efficiently carry out its mission, goals, and objectives.

(4) A summary of the program established in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 32659).

(b) The report shall be submitted to the Legislature in the manner provided in Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 738, Sec. 3.   (SB 1367)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. San Diego River Conservancy Fund [32657. - 32658.]

32657.

The San Diego River Conservancy Fund is hereby created. Moneys in the fund shall be available, upon appropriation, for the purposes of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 574, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

32658.

Proceeds or income from any lease, rental, sale, exchange, transfer of land, or interest in real property shall be deposited in the fund and shall be available for expenditure for the purposes of this division, upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 574, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4.5. San Diego Rivers Watershed Consortium [32659. - 32659.9.]

32659.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The San Diego Rivers Watershed Consortium Program will establish advisory panels for the designated watersheds of the Otay River, the Sweetwater River, and part of the Tijuana River in southern San Diego County.

(b) The San Diego region is home to one of the fastest growing populations in the nation, which is expected to grow from its current 3,300,000 people to 4,000,000 people by 2050.

(c) Residents in the southern region of San Diego County do not all have direct access to green space and public lands. Park poor communities are highly concentrated south of the San Diego River
 watershed. One benefit of living in the San Diego region is year-round access to the outdoors and the ability to improve the health and well-being of the general public by improving public access to public lands.

(d) The watersheds of the Otay River, Sweetwater River, and Tijuana River are extraordinary natural resources of statewide significance that have been subject to intense development and are in need of conservation, restoration, protection, including protection of sensitive species, improved water quality, and improved overall health of the ecosystems of the individual watersheds.

(e) The establishment of the program will enable the state to bring together multiple stakeholders to assess the needs of each watershed’s ecosystem and collaborate on watershedwide programs that conserve, restore, and protect natural, historical and cultural resources, wildlife, water quality,